ru: Спортивный логотип: Команды колледжей/университетов; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Футбольные клубы; Другое
nl: Sport-logo: Hogeschool-/universiteitsteams; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Voetbalclubs; Andere
pl: Logo sportowe: Zespoły uczelni/uniwersytetów; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Kluby piłkarskie; Inne
hu: Sportlogó: Főiskolai/egyetemi csapatok; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Futballklubok; Egyéb
ja: スポーツロゴ: 大学チーム; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; サッカークラブ; その他
vi: Logo thể thao: Đội tuyển cao đẳng/đại học; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Câu lạc bộ bóng đá; Khác
el: Αθλητικό λογότυπο: Ομάδες Κολλεγίων/Πανεπιστημίων; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; ποδοσφαιρικοί σύλλογοι; Άλλο
zh-CN: 运动 logo: 学院/大学队伍; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; 足球俱乐部; 其他
th: โลโก้กีฬา: ทีมวิทยาลัย/มหาวิทยาลัย; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; สโมสรฟุตบอล; อื่นๆ
de: Sportlogo: College-/Universitätsteams; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Fußballvereine; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Sportski logotip: Fakultetski/sveučilišni timovi; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Nogometni klubovi; Ostalo
cs: Logo sportu: Vysokoškolské/univerzitní týmy; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Fotbalové kluby; Jiné
da: Sportslogo: College/universitetshold; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Fodboldklubber; Andet
fi: Urheilulogo: College-/yliopistojoukkueet; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Jalkapalloseurat; Muu
sk-SK: Športové logo: Vysokoškolské/univerzitné tímy; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Futbalové kluby; Iné
lt-LT: Sporto logotipas: Kolegijos / universiteto komandos; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Futbolo klubai; Kita
sl-SI: Športni logotip: Višješolske/univerzitetne ekipe; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Nogometni klubi; Drugo
pt-PT: Logótipo desportivo: Equipas de faculdade/universidade; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Clubes de futebol; Outro
nb: Sportslogo: Høgskole/Universitetslag; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Fotballklubber; Annet
zh-TW: 運動標誌: 學院/大學團隊; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; 足球俱樂部; 其他
bg-BG: Спортно лого: Отбори на колежи/университети; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Футболни клубове; Други
es: Logotipo deportivo: Equipos universitarios; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Clubes de futbol; Otros
sv: Sportlogotyp: Högskole-/Universitetslag; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Fotbollsklubbar; Övrigt
pt-BR: Logotipo esportivo: Equipes de faculdades/universidades; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Clubes de futebol; Outro
it: Marchio sportivo: Squadre universitarie; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Club di calcio; Altro
fr: Logo sportif: Équipes collégiales/universitaires; MLB; NBA; NFL; LNH; Clubs de football; Autre
ko: 스포츠 로고: 대학/대학교 팀; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; 축구 클럽; 기타
tr: Spor logosu: Kolej/Üniversite takımları; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Futbol kulüpleri; Diğer
ro-RO: Logo sportiv: Echipe de colegiu/universitare; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Cluburi de fotbal; Altele
en: Sports logo: College/University teams; MLB; NBA; NFL; NHL; Soccer clubs; Other